Utah statutes.
31A-2-105.   Constitutional oath.
Before entering upon the duties of his office, the commissioner  shall take,
subscribe, and file the constitutional oath. If the commissioner takes action
in his office before complying with this section, in good faith and without
knowledge of this requirement, and the validity of his action is then
challenged, that person may take the oath after the action and the oath shall
be given retroactive effect to the date on which he began his duties.
